Hawaii statutes.
§664-6 Application for certificate.
All owners of ahupuaas and portions of ahupuaas, ilis, and portions of ilis and
other denominations of lands within the State, whose lands have not been
awarded by the land commissioners, patented or conveyed by deed from the king
or government, by boundaries decided in such award, patent, or deed, may file
with the commissioner of boundaries for the circuit in which the land is
situated, an application to have the boundaries of the land decided and
certified to by the commissioner or the commissioner's successor in office.
The application shall state the name of the land, the names of the adjoining
land or lands, and the names of the owners of the same where known, and it
shall also contain a general description, by true bearing survey, of the
boundaries as claimed connected by coordinates to the government survey
triangulation system, and shall have attached thereto and made a part thereof a
map or tracing which shall show all natural topographical features, permanent
or other marks along the boundary lines, the bearings and distances of each
course given in the description of survey, and such other data from field notes
as will make it practicable to reestablish any boundary mark or point that may
become lost or destroyed. [L 1894-5, c 14, §2; am L 1915, c 79, §2; RL 1925,
§557; RL 1935, §3665; RL 1945, §10206; RL 1955, §234-6; HRS §664-6; gen ch
1985]

Cross References

See Appendix to Revised Laws of Hawaii 1925, pp 2120-2152.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next